Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-235.02
Hospital; sinking fund; levy.

A governmental subdivision shall have the power to levy a tax, known as a hospital sinking-fund tax, upon all of the taxable property in its jurisdiction, which levy shall be in addition to all other authorized levies, for the use and benefit of the hospital, and the proceeds of such taxes when and as collected shall be set aside and deposited in the special account or accounts in which other revenue of the governmental subdivision is deposited. This levy shall be accumulated as a sinking fund by the governmental subdivision from fiscal year to fiscal year to provide funds for hospital improvements, maintenance, and operation.

Laws 1961, c. 38, § 2, p. 165;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 40.